Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.050

Officials' duties.

(1) It is the duty of the chief law enforcement officer or the local director of corrections to transmit within seventy-two hours from the time of arrest to the section fingerprints together with other identifying data as may be prescribed by the section, and statutory violations of any person lawfully arrested, fingerprinted, and photographed under RCW 43.43.735. The disposition report shall be transmitted to the prosecuting attorney, county clerk, or appropriate court of limited jurisdiction, whichever is responsible for transmitting the report to the section under RCW 10.98.010.

(2) At the preliminary hearing or the arraignment of a felony case, the judge shall ensure that the felony defendants have been fingerprinted and an arrest and fingerprint form transmitted to the section. In cases where fingerprints have not been taken, the judge shall order the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction or the local director of corrections, or, in the case of a juvenile, the juvenile court administrator to initiate an arrest and fingerprint form and transmit it to the section. The disposition report shall be transmitted to the prosecuting attorney.

[ 1999 c 49 s 2; 1989 c 6 s 1; 1987 c 450 s 6; 1985 c 201 s 2; 1984 c 17 s 5.]